Nevada, session 83, AB464.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.114 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.114 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, the State Board shall prescribe and cause to be enforced the
courses of study for the public schools of this State. The courses of
study prescribed and enforced by the State Board must comply with
the standards of content and performance established by the Council
to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to
NRS 389.520.
2. For those courses of study prescribed by the State Board:
-
*AB464_R1*

– 3 –
(a) High schools may have modified courses of study, subject to
the approval of the State Board; and
(b) Any high school offering courses normally accredited as
being beyond the level of the 12th grade shall, before offering such
courses, have them approved by the State Board.
3. A charter school is not required to offer the courses of study
prescribed by the State Board except for those courses of study
which are required for promotion to the next grade or graduation
from high school.
4. The State Board shall not repeal, abrogate or refuse to
enforce any course of study or any unit of a course of study which
was prescribed by the State Board and in existence on the effective
date of this act and which relates to:
(a) The history of genocides and other atrocities experienced
by people from various racial and ethnic backgrounds;
(b) The history, language and art of different ethnicities,
countries, communities and cultures;
(c) National and global current events;
(d) The origin, history and essentials of The United States
Constitution;
(e) Civic engagement;
(f) Socialization, communication and sensitivity to other
persons, groups and communities; and
(g) The physical and emotional development of persons,
including, without limitation, the development of the human
reproductive system.
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district shall not prohibit,
take action to prevent the offering of or refuse to enforce any
course of study prescribed and adopted by the State Board or any
material complying with the standards of content and performance
established by the Council to Establish Academic Standards for
Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520 relating to those courses
of study which:
(a) Existed on the effective date of this act; and
(b) Relate to:
(1) The history of genocides and other atrocities
experienced by people from various racial and ethnic
backgrounds;
(2) The history, language and art of different ethnicities,
countries, communities and cultures;
(3) National and global current events;
(4) The origin, history and essentials of the United States
Constitution;
-
*AB464_R1*

– 4 –
(5) Civic engagement;
(6) Socialization, communication and sensitivity to other
persons, groups and communities; and
(7) The physical and emotional development of persons,
including, without limitation, the development of the human
reproductive system.
2. The governing body of a charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils shall not prohibit, take action
to prevent the offering of or refuse to enforce any course of study
prescribed and adopted by the State Board or any material
complying with the standards of content and performance
established by the Council to Establish Academic Standards for
Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520 relating to those courses
of study which:
(a) Existed on the effective date of this act;
(b) Relate to the subjects listed in paragraph (b) of subsection
1; and
(c) The charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils, as applicable, was required by law or regulation to
enforce or offer to pupils enrolled in the charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, on
the effective date of this act.
3. A principal or administrator of a public school shall not
prohibit, take action to prevent the offering of or refuse to enforce
any course of study prescribed and adopted by the State Board or
any material complying with the standards of content and
performance established by the Council to Establish Academic
Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520 relating to
those courses of study which:
(a) Existed on the effective date of this act;
(b) Relate to the subjects listed in paragraph (b) of subsection
1; and
(c) Were required to be offered at the public school at which
the principal or administrator is employed on the effective of this
act.
4. A teacher shall not refuse to enforce or teach any course of
study prescribed and adopted by the State Board or any material
complying with the standards of content and performance
established by the Council to Establish Academic Standards for
Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520 relating to those courses
of study which:
(a) Existed on the effective date of this act;
(b) Relate to the subjects listed in paragraph (b) of subsection
1; and
-
*AB464_R1*

– 5 –
(c) The teacher would have been required to teach or enforce
on the effective date of this act.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A foreign or world language.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
-
*AB464_R1*

– 6 –
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health and the
relationship between mental health and physical health.
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1.
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
-
*AB464_R1*

– 7 –
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall not repeal, abrogate, reduce the priority
assigned to or otherwise revise for the purpose of substantially
weakening any standard of content and performance which was
established by the Council and in existence on the effective date of
this act and which relates to:
(a) The history of genocides and other atrocities experienced
by people from various racial and ethnic backgrounds;
(b) The history, language and art of different ethnicities,
countries, communities and cultures;
(c) National and global current events;
(d) The origin, history and essentials of The United States
Constitution;
(e) Civic engagement;
(f) Socialization, communication and sensitivity to other
persons, groups and communities; and
(g) The physical and emotional development of persons,
including, without limitation, the development of the human
reproductive system.
9. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
[9.] 10. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
Sec. 2. Chapter 237 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A governing body, a member of a governing body or the
direct supervisor of an administrator or a school, teacher or other
applicable public employee shall not take any adverse employment
action against an administrator of a school, teacher or other
applicable public employee, including, without limitation,
investigating, denying the professional requests of, refusing to pay
-
*AB464_R1*

– 8 –
any applicable merit-based pay to, transferring, disciplining,
demoting, suspending, dismissing or terminating the
administrator, teacher or other applicable public employee, based
on the sex, race, national origin, religion, gender identity or
expression, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability,
political, religious or social affiliation or independent political,
religious or social participation of the administrator, teacher or
other applicable public employee.
2. It is unlawful for any person to use or threaten or attempt
to use any force, intimidation, coercion, violence, restraint or
undue influence with the intent to harm or harass an
administrator of a school teacher or other applicable public
employee:
(a) Based on the sex, race, national origin, religion, gender
identity or expression, sexual orientation, physical or mental
disability, political, religious or social affiliation or independent
political, religious or social participation of the administrator,
teacher or other applicable public employee.
(b) Because the administrator, teacher or other applicable
public employee provides any instruction required pursuant to
chapter 389 of NRS, including, without limitation, NRS 389.018,
389.036, 389.054, 389.057 and 389.061.
3. The provisions of subsection 2 apply regardless of whether
a person uses or threatens or attempts to use force, intimidation,
coercion, violence, restraint or undue influence on government
property or at a location other than on government property.
4. A member of a governing body who violates the provisions
of subsection 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not more than $1,000.
5. Notwithstanding any collective bargaining agreement or
contract of employment to the contrary, a governing body or other
governmental entity that employs a person who is found to have
violated subsection 1 or 2 shall terminate the employment of the
person.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” means a person who spends at least 50
percent of his or her work year supervising other staff members or
teachers, or both, including, without limitation, a principal or vice
principal of a school.
(b) “Applicable public employee” means any employee of the
Nevada System of Higher Education, a school district, a charter
school, a university school for profoundly gifted pupils, a county
or a city.
(c) “Governing body” means the Board of Regents of the
Nevada System of Higher Education, the board of trustees of a
-
*AB464_R1*

– 9 –
school district, the governing body of a charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, a board of county
commissioners or a city council.
(d) “Independent political, religious or social participation”
means engaging in political, religious or social activity outside of
working hours.
(e) “Teacher” means a person licensed pursuant to this
chapter who is employed by the:
(1) Board of trustees of a school district to provide
instruction or other educational services to pupils enrolled in
public schools of the school district.
(2) Governing body of a charter school to provide
instruction or other educational services to pupils enrolled in the
charter school.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB464_R1*